ja: 綾織り方向: ブロークンツイル; レフトハンドツイル; 未指定; ライトハンドツイル; その他
bg-BG: Посока на кепърната сплитка: Прекъснат кепър; Ляво ориентиран кепър; Не е посочено; Дясно ориентиран кепър; Друга
ro-RO: Direcția legăturii diagonale: Twill întrerupt; Twill spre stânga; Nespecificat; Twill spre dreapta; Altele
da: Twillretning: Brudt kiper; Venstrevendt kiper; Ikke angivet; Højrevendt kiper; Andet
fi: Tvillin suunta: Murtotoimikas; Vasenkätinen toimikas; Ei määritetty; Oikeakätinen toimikas; Muu
sl-SI: Smer keper vezave: Prelomljeni keper; Levi keper; Ni določeno; Desni keper; Drugo
el: Κατεύθυνση twill: Σπαστή διαγώνια ύφανση; Αριστερόστροφο ντιαγκονάλ; Δεν καθορίζεται; Δεξιόστροφο ντιαγκονάλ; Άλλο
pt-PT: Direção da sarja: Sarja quebrada; Sarja virada à esquerda; Não especificado; Sarja virada à direita; Outro
hu: Sodrás iránya: Tört sávoly; Balos sávoly; Nincs megadva; Jobbos sávoly; Egyéb
es: Dirección de la sarga: Sarga quebrada; Sarga hacia la izquierda; No especificado; Sarga hacia la derecha; Otro
tr: Fitil yönü: Kırık dimi; Sol yönlü dimi; Belirtilmemiş; Sağ yönlü dimi; Diğer
zh-TW: 斜紋方向: 破斜紋; 左斜紋; 未指定; 右斜紋; 其他
lt-LT: Ruoželinio pynimoo kryptis: Laužtinis ruoželis; Kairinis ruoželis; Nenurodyta; Dešininis ruoželis; Kita
vi: Hướng dệt chéo: Vân chéo gãy; Vân chéo trái; Không xác định; Vân chéo phải; Khác
ko: 트윌 방향: 브로큰 능직; 좌능직; 지정되지 않음; 우능직; 기타
pt-BR: Sarja direção: Sarja quebrada; Sarja esquerda; Não especificado; Sarja direita; Outro
sk-SK: Smer kepru: Lomený keper; Ľavý keper; Nešpecifikované; Pravý keper; Iný
it: Direzione del twill: Twill spezzato; Twill a sinistra; Non specificata; Twill a destra; Altro
en: Twill direction: Broken twill; Left-hand twill; Not specified; Right-hand twill; Other
th: ทิศทางการทอ: ลายทแยงแบบแตก; ลายทแยงซ้าย; ไม่ได้ระบุ; ลายทแยงขวา; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Smjer kepera: Lomljeni keper; Lijevi keper; Nije navedeno; Desni keper; Ostalo
de: Köperrichtung: Broken Twill; Left-Hand Twill; Nicht angegeben; Right-Hand Twill; Sonstiges
ru: Направление саржи: Ломаная саржа; Левосторонняя саржа; Не указано; Правосторонняя саржа; Другое
fr: Sens du sergé: Sergé brisé; Sergé à gauche; Non spécifié; Sergé à droite; Autre
nl: Twillrichting: Gebroken keperbinding; Linkse keperbinding; Niet gespecificeerd; Rechtse keperbinding; Anders
nb: Twill-retning: Brutt twill; Venstregående twill; Ikke spesifisert; Høyregående twill; Annet
zh-CN: 斜纹方向: 破斜纹; 左斜纹; 未指定; 右斜纹; 其他
pl: Kierunek diagonalny: Diagonal łamany; Diagonal lewostronny; Nie określono; Diagonal prawostronny; Inne
sv: Twillriktning: Bruten kypert; Vänsterkypert; Ej angiven; Högerkypert; Annat
cs: Směr keprové vazby: Lomený kepr; Levý kepr; Nespecifikováno; Pravý kepr; Ostatní